Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260.03
Juvenile pretrial diversion program; goals.

The goals of a juvenile pretrial diversion program are:

(1) To provide eligible juvenile offenders with an alternative program in lieu of adjudication through the juvenile court;

(2) To reduce recidivism among diverted juvenile offenders;

(3) To reduce the costs and caseload burdens on the juvenile justice system and the criminal justice system; and

(4) To promote the collection of restitution to the victim of the juvenile offender's crime.

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 2.